Wyoming, session 2026, SF0076.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-101(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlviii), 39-15-107(a)(i), 39-15-111(b)(intro)
and by creating a new subsection (s),
39-15-211(a)(i)(intro), (d)(intro) and by creating a new
subsection (e) are amended to read:

39-15-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:
SF0076

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0409

(xlviii) "Very large electrical load" means an
electrical load of not less than one hundred (100)
megawatts for a single purchaser or customer.

39-15-107. Compliance; collection procedures.

(a) Returns, reports and preservation of records.
The following shall apply:

(i) Each vendor shall on or before the last day
of each month file a true return showing the preceding
month's gross sales and remit all taxes to the department.
The returns shall contain such information and be made in
the manner as the department by regulation prescribes. The
department may provide an option for the return to be
submitted and for any taxes to be remitted electronically.
The department may allow extensions for filing returns and
paying the taxes by regulation, but no extension may be for
more than ninety (90) days. If the total tax to be remitted
by a vendor during any month is less than one hundred fifty
dollars ($150.00), a quarterly or annual return as
authorized by the department, and remittance in lieu of the
SF0076

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0409
monthly return may be made on or before the last day of the
month following the end of the quarter or year for which
the tax is collected. If the accounting methods regularly
used by any vendor are such that reports of sales made
during a calendar month would impose unnecessary hardships,
the department after receiving a formal request filed by
the vendor may accept reports at intervals as would be more
convenient to the taxpayer. Any vendor shall report whether
the vendor sells nicotine products, as defined by W.S.
39-18-101(a)(xi), in this state to the department in the
form and manner required by the department. The department
may reject any report required under this paragraph of any
vendor who does not comply with the nicotine sales
reporting requirements. Every person purchasing goods or
services taxable by this article who does not pay the tax
owed to a vendor shall, on or before the last day of each
month, file a return showing the gross purchases made
during the preceding month and remit all taxes due to the
department. If the vendor sells electricity to serve a very
large electrical load, all sales related to the very large
electrical load shall be reported separately. The return
shall contain such information and be made in the manner as
the department shall prescribe by rule and regulation. The
SF0076

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0409
department, by rule and regulation, may allow an extension
for filing a return and paying any tax due, but no
extension shall be granted for more than ninety (90) days;

39-15-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under W.S. 39-15-104 during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (p) subsections (p) and (s) of this
section, for all revenue collected by the department under
W.S. 39-15-104 the department shall:

(s) All revenues collected by the department related
to sales of very large electrical loads shall be deposited
in the local government distribution account, which is
hereby created. All funds within the account shall be
invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings
from the account shall be deposited in the account. Funds
in the account shall be distributed as determined by the
legislature for direct distributions to cities, towns and
counties.

SF0076

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0409
39-15-211. Distribution.

(a) For all revenue collected by the department from
the taxes imposed under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), (ii), (v) and
(vi) the department shall:

(i) Except as otherwise provided under
subsection (e) of this section, for revenues collected
under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i):

(d) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (e)
of this section, for all revenue collected by the
department from the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vii)
the department shall:

(e) All revenues collected by the department under
W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), or under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vii) if
the tax is imposed for general revenue, that is related to
sales of very large electrical loads shall be deposited in
the local government distribution account as created in
W.S. 39-15-111(s).

SF0076

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0409
Section 2. The provisions of W.S. 39-15-211(e), as
created by section 1 of this act, shall only apply to a tax
under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) or 39-15-204(a)(vii) that is
imposed or continued by approval of the voters on or after
July 1, 2026. Any tax approved before July 1, 2026 shall
not be subject to the provisions of W.S. 39-15-211(e) until
the date the tax is continued by approval of the voters as
provided by law.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0076